Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1106
Director of Administrative Services; offices.

The Director of Administrative Services and the staff and division heads of such divisions as may be established within the Department of Administrative Services shall be housed in the State Capitol building or a state office building in the vicinity of the State Capitol building.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 6, p. 1694.